Louisiana, session 2026, HB1115.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 10:3-321 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§3-321. Duplicate presentment; definitions; good faith holder in due course; rights;
jurisdiction
(a) For the purposes of this Section, the following terms have the following
meanings:
(1) "Check" has the same meaning as in R.S. 10:3-104.
(2) "Financial institution" means a federally-insured depository institution
chartered pursuant to the laws of this state, another state, or the United States.
(3) "Holder in due course" has the same meaning as in R.S. 10:3-302.
(4) "Remote deposit capture" means an automated deposit transaction system
by which an electronic image of a check or the captured digital data of a check is
transmitted to a financial institution for posting and clearing without that financial
institution taking physical possession of the check.
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1534 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1115
(5) "Restrictive endorsement" means a statement, such as the words "For
Mobile Deposit Only" or substantially similar language, written or indicated on the
back of a check, authorizing that check to be submitted for deposit by remote deposit
capture.
(6) "Truncating financial institution" means a financial institution that accepts
a check for deposit by remote deposit capture.
(b)(1) A person who accepts an original paper check for value, in good faith,
and without notice that the check was previously deposited by remote deposit
capture, is a holder in due course of that check, and shall be entitled to enforce that
check against the drawer and all prior endorsers, notwithstanding that the check has
been previously paid upon presentment by remote deposit capture.
(2) For the purposes of this Section, a person is presumed to have acted in
good faith if that person, at the time of accepting the check, does all of the following:
(i) Examines the check for the presence of a restrictive endorsement
indicating prior remote deposit capture.
(ii) Requires the presenter of the check to produce a valid government-issued
photographic identification, and records the identification type, number, and
expiration date.
(iii) Verifies that the name on the check matches the identification presented.
(iv) Does not have notice that the check has been previously deposited.
(3) A person who accepts for value a check bearing a restrictive endorsement
indicating prior remote deposit capture is not deemed to have acted in good faith and
is not entitled to the protections of this Section for that check.
(c)(1) A truncating financial institution shall indemnify and hold harmless a
holder in due course of the original paper check, and the depositary financial
institution of that holder in due course, for any loss suffered as a result of the
duplicate presentment of that check, including the face amount of the check, any fees
or charges imposed on the holder in due course or its depositary bank as a result of
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1534 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1115
the dishonor or return of the check, interest at the legal rate from the date of the loss,
and attorney fees.
(2) The indemnification obligation of a truncating financial institution
pursuant to this Section arises when all of the following occur:
(i) The truncating financial institution accepted a check for deposit by remote
deposit capture without that check bearing a restrictive endorsement.
(ii) The original paper check was subsequently presented for payment by or
on behalf of a good faith holder in due course.
(iii) The payor financial institution dishonored, returned, or charged back the
original paper check as a suspected or confirmed duplicate.
(iv) The holder in due course, or its depositary financial institution, suffered
a loss as a result.
(d) A holder in due course or its depositary financial institution may assert
a claim for indemnification in accordance with this Section directly against the
truncating financial institution without first seeking recovery from the presenter of
the check who caused or participated in the duplicate presentment.
(e) Nothing in this Section shall preclude the truncating financial institution
from seeking recovery from its customer who deposited the check through remote
deposit capture, or from any other person responsible for the duplicate presentment.
(f) A nonresident truncating financial institution is deemed to have caused
injury or damage in this state when the original paper check is subsequently cashed,
deposited, or negotiated by a holder in due course located in this state and that holder
in due course suffers a loss as a result of duplicate presentment. For purposes of this
Section, the act of accepting a check for deposit by remote deposit capture that
results in a financial loss to a business in this state constitutes an act or omission
causing foreseeable injury in this state.
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1534 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1115